District of Columbia statutes.
9-633

Duties of the Department.

(a)

The Department shall be responsible for approving block party applications. No fee shall be charged for the application.

(b)

Upon receiving a completed application, the Department shall submit a copy to the Metropolitan Police Department, the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department, the Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency, and the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority for comments.

(c)

Upon approval of the application, the Department shall prepare the applicant’s permit and any parking signs. The approved block party permit shall be made available to the applicant electronically.

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-190, § 4, 59 DCR 10163